Arkansas, session 2025, HB1727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-23-1005 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-1005. Funding.
(a) Funding for an adult education charter school shall not be
provided through the Division of Career and Technical Education Public School
Fund Account of the Public School Fund.
(b) Funding for an adult education charter school may come from public
or private sources, including from the eligible entity that operates an adult
education charter school.
(c)(1) An adult education charter school shall receive per student a
funding amount equal to the per-pupil foundation funding amount established
under § 6-20-2305.
(2) An adult education charter school that receives funding
under this section shall submit a report annually to the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education and the Legislative Council that includes:
(A) Data on graduation rates of students attending the
adult education charter school; and
*CRH063*
03-19-2025 15:20:22 CRH063

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1727
(B) Employment rates of students who were enrolled in the
adult education charter school.
(3) The funding provided under this section shall be reviewed
annually based upon a review of the report under subdivision (c)(2) of this
section.

/s/L. Johnson





























03-19-2025 15:20:22 CRH063